Washington statutes.
RCW 9.47.120

Bunco steering.

Every person who shall entice, or induce another, upon any pretense, to go to any place where any gambling game, scheme or device, or any trick, sleight of hand performance, fraud or fraudulent scheme, cards, dice or device, is being conducted or operated; or while in such place shall entice or induce another to bet, wager or hazard any money or property, or representative of either, upon any such game, scheme, device, trick, sleight of hand performance, fraud or fraudulent scheme, cards, dice, or device, or to execute any obligation for the payment of money, or delivery of property, or to lose, advance, or loan any money or property, or representative of either, is guilty of a class B felony and shall be punished by imprisonment in a state correctional facility for not more than ten years.

[ 2003 c 53 s 37; 1992 c 7 s 14; 1909 c 249 s 227; RRS s 2479.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.

Swindling: Chapter 9A.60 RCW.